California statutes. Education Code
This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute that is enacted before January 1, 2030, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 492, Sec. 3.   (AB 695)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Community College Construction Act of 1980 [81800. - 81839.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions and General Provisions [81800. - 81808.]

81800.

(a) This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Community College Construction Act of 1980.

(b) The Legislature hereby declares that it is in the interest of the state and of the people thereof for the state to provide assistance to community college districts for the construction of community college facilities. The community college system is of general concern and interest to all the people of the state, and the education of community college students is a joint obligation and function of both the state and community college districts.

In enacting this chapter, the Legislature considers that there is a need to provide adequate community college facilities that will be required to accommodate community college students resulting from growth in population and from legislative policies expressed through implementation of the Master Plan for Higher Education.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 910, Sec. 2.   Effective September 17, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

81805.

This chapter shall be administered by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, and for purposes of the administration the board of governors shall adopt all necessary rules and regulations.

For purposes of this chapter, the board of governors shall assemble statewide data on facility and construction costs, and on the basis thereof formulate cost standards and construction standards. The formulation of standards shall include also the formulation of average ratios of equipment cost to total project costs, unit equipment costs per faculty or other staff measure, and unit costs related to floor areas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 566.)
-------------------------------------------

81807.

Funds appropriated for a project of a community college district for purposes of this chapter shall be allocated and disbursed upon order of the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, and by warrants of the Controller issued pursuant thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 568.)
-------------------------------------------

81808.

In the event an existing community college district is included in a newly formed community college district, any unused funds appropriated or authorized to be appropriated for a finally approved project of the included district pursuant to this chapter shall be transferred to the newly formed or including community college district on the date that such district is effective for all purposes, or prior to such effective date where the governing boards of the districts agree to such earlier transfer.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 910, Sec. 2.   Effective September 17, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Plans for Capital Construction [81820. - 81823.]

81820.

The governing board of each community college district shall prepare and submit to the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges a plan for capital construction for community college purposes of the district. The plan shall reflect capital construction for community college purposes of the district for the five-year period commencing with the next proposed year of funding. The five-year plan shall be subject to continuing review by the governing board and annually shall be extended one year, and there shall be submitted to the board of governors, on or before the first day of February in each succeeding year, a report outlining the required modifications or changes, if any, in the five-year plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 571.)
-------------------------------------------

81821.

(a) The five-year plan for capital construction shall set out the estimated capital construction needs of the district with reference to at least both of the following elements:

(1) The current enrollment capacity of the district expressed in terms of weekly student contact hours and based upon the space and utilization standards for community college classrooms and laboratories adopted by the board of governors.

(2) District office, library, and supporting facility capacities as derived from the physical plant standards for office, library, and supporting facilities adopted by the board of governors.

(b) The five-year plan for capital construction may also set out the estimated capital construction needs of the district with reference to other elements, including, but not limited to:

(1) The plans of the district concerning its future academic and student services programs, and the effect on estimated construction needs that may arise because of particular courses of instruction or subject matter areas or student services to be emphasized.

(2) The enrollment projections for each district formulated by the Department of Finance, expressed in terms of weekly student contact hours. The enrollment projections for each individual college and educational center within a district shall be made cooperatively by the Department of Finance and the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(3) An annual inventory of all facilities and land of the district using standard definitions, forms, and instructions adopted by the board of governors.

(4) An estimate of district funds that shall be made available for capital outlay matching purposes pursuant to regulations adopted by the board of governors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 34, Sec. 15.   (SB 860)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

81822.

The board of governors shall review and evaluate the plan for capital construction submitted by the governing board of each community college district in terms of the elements of the capital construction program specified in Section 81821, and shall, on the basis of the review and evaluation, make the revision and changes therein as are appropriate, and notify the district. A similar review and evaluation of continuing five-year plans for capital construction submitted by the governing board of each community college district shall be made. The board of governors shall, promptly after review, notify the governing board of each community college district of the content of the district’s revised plan for capital construction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 573.)
-------------------------------------------

81823.

(a) If a community college district maintains colleges, or one college and one or more educational centers, it may additionally submit the plan required by Section 81820 on the basis of each college or educational center maintained by the district, if either of the following circumstances is present such that students will be better served by evaluating the capital outlay program for the district on that basis: (1) the isolation of students within a district in terms of the distance of students from the location of an educational program, or inadequacy of transportation, and student financial inability to meet costs of transportation to an educational program; or (2) the inability of existing colleges and educational centers in the district to meet the unique educational and cultural needs of a significant number of ethnic students.

(b) If a district elects to submit such a plan, it shall include therewith justification and documentation for so doing.

(c) When a district so elects, the evaluation of the plan pursuant to Section 81822 shall include an evaluation of both of the following:

(1) The justification and documentation for so doing, including enrollment projections for individual campuses and centers.

(2) The plan as thus submitted.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 910, Sec. 2.   Effective September 17, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Project Proposals [81836. - 81839.]

81836.

The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall:

(a) Advise the governing board of each community college district on the acquisition of new college sites, and after a review of available plots, give the governing board of the district in writing a list of the approved locations in the order of their merit, considering especially the matters of educational merit, reduction of traffic hazards, and conformity to the organized regional plans as presented in the master plan of the planning commission having jurisdiction, and charge the governing board of the community college district a reasonable fee as determined by the board of governors for each 10 acres or fraction thereof of schoolsite reviewed.

(b) Establish standards for community college facilities.

(c) Review plans and specifications for all construction in those community college districts that have submitted plans and specifications therefor to the board of governors for approval.

(d) For services rendered for the review of plans and specifications of a proposed project, the board of governors shall charge a reasonable fee as established by it.

(e) Approve plans and specifications submitted by governing boards of community college districts, and return without approval and with recommendation for changes, any plans not conforming to established standards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 577.)
-------------------------------------------

81837.

The governing board of each community college district, before letting any contract or contracts totaling one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000), or more, in the erection of any new community college facility, or for any addition to, or alteration of, an existing community college facility, shall submit plans therefor to the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, and obtain the written approval of the plans by the board of governors. No contract for construction made by any governing board of a community college district contrary to this section is valid, nor shall any public money be paid for erecting, adding to, or altering any facility in contravention of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 578.)
-------------------------------------------

81839.

The governing board of a community college district may include a proposed site in its plans for a project and may enter into an agreement with the owner of property constituting such proposed site whereby the district, for an annual consideration to be borne by the district, is given an option to purchase, or lease with an option to purchase such property at an unspecified future date, as a building site.

The existence of such an agreement shall in no way affect the determination of the share of the cost of the project to be borne by the state under this chapter, and the consideration paid by the district for such option or lease shall not be considered part of the cost of the project in determining the state’s share of the funding thereof.

Such option or lease agreement shall constitute an obligation of the district and shall not be construed as in any way creating an obligation on the part of the state.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 910, Sec. 2.   Effective September 17, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Community College Revenue Bond Act of 1961 [81901. - 81966.]

81901.

(a) The governing board of any community college district may issue revenue bonds pursuant to this chapter.

(b) The board, for the purpose of this chapter, has power and is hereby authorized, in addition to and amplification of all other powers conferred upon the board by the Constitution of the State of California or by any statute of the State of California:

(1) To acquire subject to the state law, by grant, purchase, gift, devise, or lease, or by the exercise of the right of eminent domain, and to hold and use any real or personal property necessary or convenient or useful for the carrying on of any of its powers pursuant to this chapter.

(2) To construct, operate, and control any project.

(3) To fix rates, rents, or other charges for the use of any project acquired, constructed, equipped, furnished, operated, or maintained by the board, or for services rendered in connection therewith, and to alter, change, or modify the same at its pleasure, subject to any contractual obligation which may be entered into by the board with respect to the fixing of these rates, rents, or charges.

(4) To enter into covenants to increase rates or charges from time to time as may be necessary pursuant to any contract or agreement with the holders of any bonds of the board.

(5) At any time and from time to time, to issue revenue bonds in order to raise funds for the purpose of establishing any project, of acquiring lands for any project, of acquiring, constructing, improving, equipping, or furnishing any project, of refinancing any project, or for any combination of these purposes, which bonds may be secured as provided in this chapter.

(6) To exercise, subject to state law, the right of eminent domain for the condemnation of private property or any right or interest therein.

(7) To adopt the rules and regulations as may be necessary to enable the board to exercise the powers and to perform the duties conferred or imposed upon the board by this chapter.

(8) Nothing contained in this section or elsewhere in this chapter shall be construed directly or by implication to be in derogation of, or in limitation of, the powers conferred upon or existing in the board by virtue of provisions of the Constitution or statutes of this state.

(c) The board shall determine the time, form, and manner of the issuance of revenue bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 582.)
-------------------------------------------

81902.

The following terms wherever used in this chapter, or in any indenture entered into pursuant to this chapter, have the following meanings, unless a different meaning appears from the context:

(a) “Board” means the governing board of a community college district.

(b) “Community college” means a community college maintained by the district issuing bonds under this chapter.

(c) “Project” means any one or more dormitories or other housing facilities, boarding facilities, student union or activity facilities, vehicle parking facilities, or any other auxiliary or supplementary facilities for individual or group accommodation, owned or operated or authorized to be acquired, constructed, furnished, equipped, and operated by the board for use by students, faculty members, or other employees of any one or more community colleges, or a combination of such facilities, which may include facilities already completed and facilities authorized for future completion, designated by the board as a project in providing for the issuance of revenue bonds.

(d) “Bonds” or “revenue bonds” mean the written evidence of any obligation issued by the board, payment of which is secured by a pledge of revenues or any part of revenues, as provided in this chapter, in order to obtain funds with which to carry out the purposes of this chapter, irrespective of the form of such obligations.

(e) “Revenues” mean and include any and all fees, rates, rentals, and other charges received or receivable in connection with, and any and all other incomes and receipts of whatever kind and character derived by, the board from the operation of or arising from a project, including any such revenue as may have been or may be impounded or deposited in any fund in the county treasury created by this chapter for the security of any revenue bonds issued hereunder, or for the purpose of providing for the payment thereof or the interest thereon.

(f) “Holder of bonds” or “bondholder” or any similar terms mean any person who is the bearer of any outstanding revenue bond or bond registered to bearer or not registered or the registered owner of any such outstanding revenue bond or bond which shall at the time be registered other than to bearer.

(g) “Indentures” mean an agreement entered into by the board pursuant to which revenue bonds are issued, regardless of whether such agreement is expressed in the form of a resolution of the board or by other instrument.

(h) “Person” includes any individual, firm, corporation, association, copartnership, trust, business trust, or receiver or any trustee or conservator for any thereof, but does not include the state or any public corporation, political subdivision, city, county, district or any agency thereof or of the state.

(i) “County treasurer” means the treasurer of the county in which all or a majority of the assessed valuation of the district lies at the time bonds are issued under this chapter.

(j) “County” means the county, or city and county, in which all or a majority of the assessed valuation of the community college district lies at the time bonds are issued under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective June 11, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 251.)
-------------------------------------------

81904.

The validity of the authorization and issuance of any revenue bonds by the board is not dependent on or affected in any way by:

(a) Proceedings taken by the board for the acquisition, construction, or completion of any project or any part thereof.

(b) Any contracts made by the board in connection with the acquisition, construction, or completion of any project.

(c) The failure to complete any project for which bonds are authorized to be issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective June 11, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 251.)
-------------------------------------------

81905.

The board shall issue revenue bonds in its name and as its obligation, but no bond issued or sold pursuant to this chapter shall be or become a lien, charge, or liability against the State of California, against the community college district, or against the board, or against the property or funds of the state, district, or board, except to the extent of the pledge of revenues or part of revenues of the project, as may be provided by the indenture pursuant to which revenue bonds are issued. Every revenue bond issued by the board shall contain a recital on the face thereof, stating that neither the payment of the principal nor any part thereof, nor any interest thereon, constitutes a debt, liability, or obligation of the State of California or of the community college district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective June 11, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 251.)
-------------------------------------------

81907.

The community college board may enter into indentures providing for the aggregate principal amount, date or dates, maturities, interest rates, denominations, form, registration, transfer, and interchange of any revenue bonds and coupons issued pursuant to this chapter, and the terms and conditions on which the same shall be executed, issued, secured, sold, paid, redeemed, funded, and refunded. Reference on the face of the bonds to such indenture by its date of adoption, or the apparent date on the face thereof, is sufficient to incorporate all of the provisions of the indenture and of this chapter into the body of the bonds and their appurtenant coupons. Each taker and subsequent holder of the bonds or coupons, whether the coupons are attached to or detached from the bonds, has recourse to all of the provisions of the indenture and of this chapter, and is bound thereby.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective June 11, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 251.)
-------------------------------------------

81908.

(a) An indenture pursuant to which bonds are issued may include any and all covenants and agreements on the part of the board as the board deems necessary or advisable for the better security of the bonds issued thereunder. An indenture may include a clause, relating to the bonds issued thereunder, requiring the board to do any or all of the following:

(1) To pay or cause to be paid punctually the principal of all the bonds and the interest thereon on the date or dates, or at the place or places, and in the manner mentioned in the bonds and in the coupons appertaining thereto in accordance with the indenture.

(2) To operate the project continuously, to the extent practicable under conditions as they may from time to time exist, in an efficient and economical manner.

(3) To make all necessary repairs, renewals, and replacements to any project, and to keep the project at all times in good repair, working order, and condition.

(4) To preserve and protect the security of the bonds and the rights of the holders thereof and to warrant and defend these rights.

(5) To pay and discharge or cause to be paid and discharged all lawful claims for labor, materials, and supplies or other charges which, if unpaid, might become a lien or charge upon the revenues, or any part thereof, of any project acquired, constructed, or completed from the proceeds of the sale of the bonds, or upon any physical properties, or which might impair the security of the bonds.

(6) To fix, prescribe, and collect rates, rentals, or other charges in connection with the services and facilities furnished from the project acquired, constructed, or purchased from part or all of the proceeds of the bonds, sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds as they become due and payable, together with additional sums as may be required for any fund created by this chapter, for the further security of these bonds, or as a depreciation charge or other charge in connection with the project.

(7) To hold or cause to be held in trust the revenues or any part of the revenues pledged to the payment of the bonds and the interest thereon, or to any reserve or other fund created by this chapter for the further protection of the bonds, and to apply the revenues or any part of revenues or cause them to be applied only as provided in the indenture.

(b) An indenture may also include clauses which do any or all of the following:

(1) Limit, restrict, or prohibit any right, power, or privilege of the board to mortgage or otherwise encumber, sell, lease, or dispose of any improvements constructed from the proceeds of the bonds, or to enter into any lease or agreement which impairs or impedes the operation of a project, or any part thereof, necessary to secure adequate revenues or which otherwise impairs or impedes the rights of the holders of the bonds with respect to these revenues.

(2) Define the power of the board in applying the proceedings of the sale of any issue of bonds for the purpose of acquiring, constructing, or completing any project or any part thereof.

(3) Limit the power of the board to issue additional bonds for the purpose of acquiring, constructing, or completing any project or any part thereof.

(4) Require, specify, or limit the kind, amount, and character of insurance to be maintained by the board on any project, or any part thereof, and the use and disposition of the proceeds of any insurance thereafter collected.

(5) Provide the events of default and the terms and conditions upon which any or all of the bonds of the board then or thereafter issued may become or be declared due and payable prior to maturity, and the terms and conditions upon which this declaration and its consequences may be waived.

(6) Designate the rights, limitations, powers, and duties arising upon breach by the board of any of the covenants, conditions, or obligations contained in any indenture.

(7) Prescribe a procedure by which the terms and conditions of the indenture may be subsequently amended or modified with the consent of the board and the vote or written assent of the holders of a specified principal amount or specified proportion of the bonds issued and outstanding. The clause may provide for meetings of bondholders and for the manner in which the consent of the bondholders may be given. The clause shall specifically state the effect of an amendment or modification upon the rights of the holders of all of the bonds and interest coupons appertaining thereto, whether attached thereto or detached therefrom.

With respect to any clause providing for the modification or amendment of an indenture, the board may agree that bonds held by the county treasurer, the United States or any instrumentality thereof, or the State of California or any political subdivision thereof (including every municipal corporation, district, public corporation, board, or agency of any kind or class) shall not be counted as outstanding bonds, or be entitled to vote or assent, but shall, nevertheless, be subject to modification or amendment.

(8) Provide for other acts and matters as may be necessary, convenient, or desirable in order to better secure the bonds or to make the bonds more marketable. 

(c) The board may provide in an indenture for the carrying of liability or property or any other insurance in any amount or character it shall determine, and for the payment of the premiums thereon.

(d) The board may include in an indenture the limitations as to competitive projects, both as to location and comparative rentals, as may be deemed necessary or desirable for the security of revenue bonds issued pursuant to this chapter. 

(e) The board may include in an indenture a covenant that no project acquired, constructed, or completed from the proceeds of revenue bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter shall be used without charge therefor or any facilities thereof be furnished free of charge to any person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 585.)
-------------------------------------------

81909.

An indenture may provide that payments of principal and interest of bonds shall be secured by all or by part of revenues.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective June 11, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 251.)
-------------------------------------------

81925.

The county treasurer shall act as trustee for the board and the holders of bonds issued pursuant to this chapter. The board may authorize the trustee to act on behalf of the holders of the bonds, or any stated percentage thereof, and to exercise and prosecute on behalf of the holders of the bonds such rights and remedies as may be available to the holders. The board may provide in the indenture for the deposit of all revenues received from the project with the trustee to be held in a separate account in the community college dormitory revenue fund of the district created by this chapter. The money in that fund shall be disbursed only as provided in the indenture.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective June 11, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 251.)
-------------------------------------------

81926.

The board shall prescribe the duties and powers of the trustee with respect to the issuance, authentication, sale, and delivery of the bonds and the payment of principal and interest thereof, the redemption of the bonds, the registration and discharge from registration of the bonds, and the management of any sinking fund or other funds provided as security for the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective June 11, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 251.)
-------------------------------------------

81927.

The board may provide for one or several issues of bonds and may issue bonds in series or may divide any issue into one or more divisions and fix different maturities or dates of such bonds, different rates of interest, or prescribe different terms and conditions for the bonds of the several series or divisions. It is not necessary that all bonds of the same authorized issue be of the same kind or character, have the same security, or be of the same interest rate, but the terms thereof shall in each case be provided for by the board at or prior to the issue thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective June 11, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 251.)
-------------------------------------------

81928.

Bonds may be issued as coupon bonds or as registered bonds. The board may provide for the interchange of coupon bonds for registered bonds and registered bonds for coupon bonds, and may provide that the bonds shall be registered as to principal only, or as to both principal and interest, or otherwise as the board may determine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective June 11, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 251.)
-------------------------------------------

81929.5.

Bonds shall bear interest at a rate of not to exceed 12 percent per annum, payable annually or semiannually, or in part annually and in part semiannually.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 33) by Stats. 1989, Ch. 321, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

81930.

Bonds may be callable upon such terms and conditions, and upon such notice, as the board may determine, and upon the payment of such premium as may be fixed by the board in the proceedings for the issuance of the bonds. No bond is subject to call or redemption prior to its fixed maturity date unless the right to exercise the call is expressly stated on the face of the bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective June 11, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 251.)
-------------------------------------------

81932.

The board may provide for the execution and authentication of bonds by the manual, or by lithographed or printed facsimile, signature of officers of the board and by additional authentication by the county treasurer as trustee. If any of the officers whose signatures or countersignatures appear upon the bonds or coupons cease to be officers before the delivery of the bonds or coupons, their signatures or countersignatures are nevertheless valid and of the same force and effect as if the officers had remained in office until the delivery of the bonds and coupons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective June 11, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 251.)
-------------------------------------------

81933.

Bonds shall bear dates prescribed by the board. Bonds may be serial bonds or sinking fund bonds with such maturities as the board may determine. No bond by its terms shall mature in more than 50 years from its own date and, in the event any authorized issue is divided into two or more series or divisions, the maximum maturity date authorized by this section shall be calculated from the date on the face of each bond separately, irrespective of the fact that different dates may be prescribed for the bonds of each separate series or division of any authorized issue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective June 11, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 251.)
-------------------------------------------

81934.

Immediately after the adoption of a resolution by the board, directing the preparation of any bonds authorized under this chapter, the county treasurer shall prepare the requisite number of suitable bonds of the denominations and in accordance with the specifications contained in the resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective June 11, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 251.)
-------------------------------------------

81935.

When the bonds authorized to be issued under this chapter are duly executed, they shall be sold by the county treasurer, for cash, in such parcels and numbers as directed by the board, after a resolution requesting the sale has been adopted by the board. Before offering any of the bonds for sale, the treasurer shall detach therefrom all coupons, if any, which have matured or will mature before the day fixed for the sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective June 11, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 251.)
-------------------------------------------

81936.5.

Bonds may be sold at either public or private sale. The board may fix terms and conditions for the sale or other disposition of any authorized issue of bonds. The county treasurer, when authorized by resolution of the board, may sell bonds at less than their par or face value, but no bond may be sold at a price below the par or face value thereof which would result in a sale price yielding to the purchaser an average of more than 12 percent per annum, payable semiannually, according to standard tables of bond values.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 33) by Stats. 1989, Ch. 321, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

81937.

The board may provide for the security of bonds. The board may use and expend all or any part of any funds or proceeds of any property owned by it, whether received by gift, appropriation, or otherwise, if not restricted as to the use of such funds or proceeds of property by the terms of any gift or trust or provision of law for the redemption of bonds issued pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and the payment of interest due thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective June 11, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 251.)
-------------------------------------------

81938.

All costs and expenses incident to the issuance and sale of bonds may be paid out of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds. Interest on bonds may be paid out of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds during the actual construction of any project for the acquisition, construction, or completion of which the bonds have been issued, and for a period of not to exceed two years thereafter as provided for in the indenture.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective June 11, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 251.)
-------------------------------------------

81939.

The board may provide that the bonds and the interest thereon shall be secured by all or by part of revenues of a project upon the basis of which revenue bonds are issued or authorized to be issued, and shall constitute such lien upon the revenues of such project as may be provided for in the indenture.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective June 11, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 251.)
-------------------------------------------

81940.

Pending the actual issuance or delivery of revenue bonds, the board may issue temporary or interim bonds, certificates or receipts of any denomination whatsoever, and with or without coupons, to be exchanged for definitive bonds when ready for delivery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective June 11, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 251.)
-------------------------------------------

81941.

The board may provide for the replacement of lost, destroyed, or mutilated bonds or coupons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective June 11, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 251.)
-------------------------------------------

81942.

Bonds issued pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and the interest or income therefrom are exempt from all taxation in this state other than gift, inheritance, and estate taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective June 11, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 251.)
-------------------------------------------

81943.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all bonds sold and delivered pursuant to this chapter are legal investments for all trust funds and for the funds of all insurance companies, banks, both commercial and savings, trust companies, the state school funds, and any public or private funds which may be invested in county, municipal, or community college district bonds, and may be deposited as security for the performance of any act whenever the bonds of any county, municipality, or community college district may be so deposited, and may also be used as security for the deposit of public moneys in banks in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective June 11, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 251.)
-------------------------------------------

81944.

The board may provide for the issuance, sale, or exchange of refunding bonds for the purpose of redeeming or retiring any revenue bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter. All provisions of this chapter applicable to the issuance of revenue bonds are applicable to the funding or refunding bonds and to the issuance, sale, or exchange thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective June 11, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 251.)
-------------------------------------------

81945.

Funding or refunding bonds may be issued in a principal amount sufficient to provide funds for the payment of all bonds to be funded or refunded thereby, and in addition for the payment of all expenses incident to the calling, retiring, or paying of the outstanding bonds, and the issuance of the funding or refunding bonds. These expenses include the difference in amount between the par value of the funding or refunding bonds and any amount less than par for which the funding or refunding bonds are sold, any amount necessary to be made available for the payment of interest upon such funding or refunding bonds from the date of sale thereof to the date of payment of the bonds to be funded or refunded or to the date upon which the bonds to be funded or refunded will be paid pursuant to the call thereof or agreement with the holders thereof, and the premium, if any, necessary to be paid in order to call or retire the outstanding bonds and the interest accruing thereon to the date of the call or retirement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective June 11, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 251.)
-------------------------------------------

81946.

All bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter are negotiable instruments, except when registered in the name of a registered owner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   Effective June 11, 1982.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 251.)
-------------------------------------------

81947.

Before issuing any bonds pursuant to this chapter, the board shall by resolution declare the purpose for which the proceeds of the bonds proposed to be issued shall be expended and shall specify the maximum amount of bonds to be issued or sold for that purpose. The bonds shall not be issued or sold for that purpose in an amount exceeding the specified maximum except with the consent of bondholders, pursuant to amendment or modification of an indenture, as provided in Section 81908. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the board from amending any resolution prior to the issuance of bonds authorized thereby to increase or decrease the maximum amount of bonds to be issued or sold. The issuance of bonds for one or more projects may be included in a single resolution of authorization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 602.)
-------------------------------------------
